Hawaii statutes.
[§486-107] Type evaluation; requirements;
certificate of conformance. Any weight or measure, or any weighing or
measuring instrument or device, shall have a certificate of conformance
indicating that it has passed a national type evaluation by a participating
laboratory, prior to being introduced for use for commercial or law enforcement
purposes in the State. [L 1991, c 153, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next